Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 2. Metropolitan Planning Organizations.

Sec. 19.20.200.
Establishment of metropolitan planning organizations.

In order to coordinate transportation planning in urbanized areas and achieve the transportation planning goals of 23 U.S.C. 134 and 49 U.S.C. 5303 — 5306, a metropolitan planning organization shall be established for each metropolitan area of the state when required for participation in a federal transportation program. A metropolitan area is an urbanized area with a population of more than 50,000 persons.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 2004)

Sec. 19.20.210.
Membership of the policy boards of metropolitan planning organizations.

The policy board of a metropolitan planning organization established under AS

19.20.200

for a metropolitan area with a population greater than 200,000 persons shall consist of at least seven voting members. A quorum of the policy board is a majority of the voting members of the board. Four voting members of the board shall be designated by the municipalities that are located partially or wholly within the metropolitan area. Three voting members shall be appointed by the governor. At least one member designated by the municipalities and at least one member appointed by the governor shall be public members who reside within the metropolitan area and who are not elected public officials. The public members shall serve for three-year terms.

Two nonvoting members of the policy board of a metropolitan planning organization that is subject to (a) of this section shall be designated as follows:

one member of the senate who is elected from a district, of which more than 50 percent is located within the metropolitan area, and who is designated by the president of the senate; a person who is designated to serve as a member of the policy board of a metropolitan planning organization under this paragraph may not receive compensation for service on the metropolitan planning organization; and

one member of the house of representatives who is elected from a district, of which more than 50 percent is located within the metropolitan area, and who is designated by the speaker of the house of representatives; a person who is designated to serve as a member of the policy board of a metropolitan planning organization under this paragraph may not receive compensation for service on the metropolitan planning organization.

The governor may appoint an additional voting member to the policy board of a metropolitan planning organization that is subject to (a) of this section to represent a private entity that administers or operates a major mode of transportation within the metropolitan area.

The governor may appoint additional nonvoting members to the policy board of a metropolitan planning organization that is subject to (a) of this section if the additional nonvoting members are authorized in the agreement between the governor and the participating local governments that designates the metropolitan planning organization.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For provision applying this section to the policy board of the metropolitan planning organization for the Anchorage metropolitan area, see § 3, ch. 119, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 19.20.220.
Approval of local transportation improvement plan.

The governor may approve a transportation improvement plan or an amendment to a transportation improvement plan prepared by a metropolitan planning organization if the plan is consistent with applicable federal law and regulation and the policy board of the metropolitan planning organization is organized in accordance with applicable provisions of AS

19.20.210

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 2004)